Tennessee, session 114, SB2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-17-110(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1)
(A) A person who has completed the educational requirements for
licensure as a speech language pathologist and has received at least a master's
degree from an approved educational institution may apply for and receive from
the board a provisional license to practice as a clinical fellow during the person's
period of supervised clinical experience.
(B) An American Speech and Hearing Association (ASHA) certificate of
clinical competence is not required for an applicant to be eligible for a provisional
license under this subsection (c), and the board shall not require by rule such
certificate as an eligibility requirement.
(C) The board may adopt rules to establish standards and procedures to
govern provisional licenses and the provisional license fee.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-17-111(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g) A person who has made application to the board for licensure in this state as
a speech language pathologist or audiologist may perform activities and services of a
SB2065
008719
- 1 -

speech language pathology or audiological nature without a valid license while
disposition of the person's application is pending, if the person:
(1)
(A) Has passed the examination required for licensure under §
63-17-110(b)(2); or
(B) Is licensed in another state; and
(2)
(A) Is an applicant for licensure as a speech language
pathologist, the person holds an American Speech and Hearing
Association (ASHA) certificate of clinical competence, or an equivalent
certification acceptable to the board; or
(B) Is an applicant for licensure as an audiologist, the person
holds a doctor of audiology degree (Au.D.) from an accredited institution
of higher education.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 008719